Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 677.100 is amended to read:
677.100. (1) An applicant for a  license to practice medicine in this state, except as otherwise
provided in subsection (2) of this section, must possess the following qualifications:
(a) Have attended and graduated from a school of medicine.
(b) Have satisfactorily completed the following post-graduate requirement:
(A) Satisfactory completion of an approved  rotating internship if a graduate of an approved
school of medicine;
(B) One year of training in an approved program if a graduate of an  approved school of medi-
cine; or
(C) Three  years of training in an approved program if a graduate of an unapproved school of
medicine.
(c) Have complied with each rule of the Oregon Medical Board  which applies to all similar ap-
plicants for a license to practice medicine in this state.
(d) Have provided evidence sufficient to prove to the satisfaction of the  board that the applicant
is of good moral character.  For purposes of this section, the lack of good moral character may be
established by reference to  acts or conduct that reflect moral turpitude or to acts or conduct which
would cause a reasonable person to have substantial doubts about the  individual’s honesty, fairness
and respect for the rights of others and  for the laws of the state and the nation. The acts or conduct
in question must be rationally connected to the applicant’s fitness to practice medicine.
(2) If an applicant establishes that the  applicant is of good moral character and has qualifica-
tions which the board determines are the equivalent  of the qualifications required by subsection
(1)(a) to (c) of this section, the applicant satisfies the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.
(3) An applicant for a license  to practice medicine must make written application to the board
showing compliance  with this section, ORS 677.110[ , 677.120] and the rules of the board, and con-
taining such further information as the rules of the board may require.
SECTION 2.
ORS 677.120 is repealed.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 873 (SB 873-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate March 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 873 (SB 873-INTRO) Page 2